Louisiana, session 2026, HB1171.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 56:109.5 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§109.5. Use of airboats on the Maurepas Swamp Wildlife Management Area
Use of airboats within the Maurepas Swamp Wildlife Management Area shall
be permitted.
Section 2. R.S. 56:109.4 is hereby repealed in its entirety.